Colorado, session 2026A, HB1117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The state of Colorado has established distinct license types,
each granting specific privileges related to cannabis sales and
consumption;
(b) The privilege of on-site consumption of cannabis is uniquely
held by hospitality licensees, similar to how the privilege of sales is held
-2- 1117

by retail and medical licensees; and
(c) This act is not intended to create a new license type or impose
additional regulatory burdens but rather to expand and clarify the
privileges already granted to hospitality licensees through a temporary,
event-based permitting structure.
(2) The general assembly further declares that the purpose of this
act is to authorize temporary hospitality events operated under existing
cannabis license privileges to encourage collaboration among hospitality,
retail, and cultivation licensees.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-103, add
(14.5), (45.5), and (70) as follows:
44-10-103. Definitions - rules.
As used in this article 10, unless the context otherwise requires:
(14.5) "EVENT PREMISES" MEANS THE PUBLIC LOCATION
WHERE A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT IS HELD AND THAT
IS NOT THE LICENSED PREMISES OF THE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER OR ANY PARTICIPATING LICENSEE.

(45.5) "PARTICIPATING LICENSEE" MEANS A RETAIL MARIJUANA
STORE, MEDICAL MARIJUANA STORE, RETAIL MARIJUANA CULTIVATION
FACILITY, MEDICAL MARIJUANA CULTIVATION FACILITY, RETAIL
MARIJUANA PRODUCTS MANUFACTURER, OR MEDICAL MARIJUANA
PRODUCTS MANUFACTURER THAT PARTNERS WITH A MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY BUSINESS OR A RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES
BUSINESS TO PARTICIPATE IN A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENT FOR PURPOSES OF ON-SITE REGULATED MARIJUANA CONSUMPTION
BUT NOT SALES OR DISTRIBUTION.
-3- 1117

(70) "TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT" MEANS A
TIME-LIMITED EVENT THAT ALLOWS ON-SITE REGULATED MARIJUANA
CONSUMPTION AND THAT IS HOSTED BY A MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
BUSINESS WITH PARTICIPATING LICENSEES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-203, add
(2)(ll), (2)(mm), and (2)(nn) as follows:
44-10-203. State licensing authority - rules.
(2) Mandatory rule-making. Rules adopted pursuant to section
44-10-202 (1)(c) must include the following subjects:
(ll) LICENSE RENEWAL APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS, PROCEDURES,
AND FEES FOR LICENSED MARIJUANA BUSINESSES THAT WERE ISSUED A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 44-10-609 (5) OR 44-10-610 (6) BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION
DURING THE PREVIOUS LICENSE TERM. RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(ll) MAY INCLUDE INCREASED RENEWAL FEES FOR
LICENSEES APPROVED TO HOLD TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENTS PURSUANT TO A PERMIT OR A LICENSE ENDORSEMENT WITH A
REQUISITE FEE IN ORDER TO ACCOUNT FOR LICENSEES APPROVED TO HOLD
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS PURSUANT TO A PERMIT OR
A LICENSE ENDORSEMENT ISSUED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(mm) ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING
FORMS OR PROCESSES, FOR LICENSEES AND LOCAL JURISDICTIONS TO
NOTIFY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HAS BEEN ISSUED;
(nn) FOR THE PAMPHLET DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 44-10-609
(5)(d)(II) AND 44-10-610 (6)(d)(II), STANDARDS THAT GIVE A
DESCRIPTION OF THE DANGERS OF AND PENALTIES OF DRIVING WHILE
-4- 1117

IMPAIRED BY OR UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF THC.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-609, add (5)
as follows:
44-10-609. Marijuana hospitality business license - temporary
marijuana hospitality event permit - repeal.
(5) Temporary marijuana hospitality event permit.
(a) (I) A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT
AUTHORIZES A MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY BUSINESS LICENSEE TO HOST
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS WHERE CONSUMPTION OF
REGULATED MARIJUANA IS AUTHORIZED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION (5).
(II) TO BE ISSUED A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMIT BY THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY, AN APPLICANT MUST:
(A) HOLD AN APPROVED MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY BUSINESS
LICENSE; AND
(B) BE ISSUED A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMIT BY A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY FOR EACH TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(b) Local licensing authority.
(I) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
AN ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, CREATE A
FRAMEWORK TO ISSUE AND REGULATE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS. IF THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY
ADOPTS A FRAMEWORK TO ISSUE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENT PERMITS, THE FRAMEWORK MUST:
(A) LIMIT A SINGLE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
TO SEVENTY-TWO HOURS;
-5- 1117

(B) REQUIRE A PERMIT TO BE ISSUED FOR EACH TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT;
(C) REQUIRE AN APPLICATION BE SUBMITTED FOR EACH PERMIT;
(D) LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENTS TO FIFTEEN PER CALENDAR YEAR;
(E) MAKE A PERMIT NONTRANSFERRABLE; AND
(F) PROVIDE FOR AN APPEAL FOR DENYING THE ISSUANCE OF A
PERMIT TO AN APPLICANT.
(II) WHEN CREATING THE FRAMEWORK AUTHORIZED IN
SUBSECTION (5)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY
MAY:
(A) IMPOSE REASONABLE CONDITIONS CONCERNING SAFETY,
TRAFFIC, AND NEIGHBORHOOD AFFECTS REQUIRED TO ISSUE A TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT; AND
(B) SET THE PERMIT FEE TO COVER THE COST OF ISSUING AND
ADMINISTRATING THE FRAMEWORK.
(III) A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT ISSUE A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT UNLESS THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION HAS ADOPTED A RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE AUTHORIZING
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION.
(c) Application and issuance.
(I) (A) TO BE ISSUED AND TO HOLD A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT, AN APPLICANT MUST FILE AN APPLICATION
WITH THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS BEFORE
THE APPLICANT'S PROPOSED TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(B) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY REVIEWS TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATIONS AND ISSUES
-6- 1117

TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS. UPON AN
APPLICATION BY A MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY BUSINESS LICENSEE, THE
LOCAL LICENSING SHALL INVESTIGATE EACH TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATION AND SHALL EITHER APPROVE OR
DENY THE APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 10 AND ANY
APPLICABLE LOCAL ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION.
(C) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY DOES NOT REVIEW
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATIONS OR
ISSUE OF TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS.
(II) WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER ISSUING A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT, THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL
REPORT, IN A MANNER REQUIRED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY,
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(A) THE ISSUANCE OF THE PERMIT;
(B) THE NAME OF THE MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY BUSINESS
LICENSEE ISSUED THE PERMIT;
(C) THE ADDRESS OF THE PERMITTED EVENT LOCATION; AND
(D) THE PERMITTED DATES AND TIMES FOR THE EVENT.
(d) Requirements and limitations.
(I) A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER
SHALL NOT:
(A) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT IN
A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT HAS NOT ADOPTED A RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE AUTHORIZING TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS
WITHIN THE JURISDICTION;
(B) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
WITHOUT A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (5) BY A LOCAL
-7- 1117

LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(C) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT ON
PREMISES LICENSED OR PERMITTED TO SELL OR SERVE ALCOHOL OR
TOBACCO UNDER ARTICLE 3, 4, 5, OR 7 OF THIS TITLE 44;
(D) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT ON
PREMISES LICENSE TO SELL OR SERVE REGULATED MARIJUANA UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 10;
(E) SELL, TRANSFER, OR DISTRIBUTE REGULATED MARIJUANA AT
A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT;
(F) OPERATE A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT FOR
LONGER THAN SEVENTY-TWO CONSECUTIVE HOURS;
(G) HOST MORE THAN FIFTEEN TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENTS DURING A CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(H) VIOLATE A LAW ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL LICENSING
AUTHORITY, THIS ARTICLE 10, OR A RULE ADOPTED UNDER THIS ARTICLE
10 BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(II) DURING A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT, THE
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER SHALL
PROVIDE, AT EACH ENTRANCE TO THE EVENT PREMISES, A PAMPHLET OF
EDUCATION MATERIALS THAT COMPLIES WITH THE RULES ADOPTED UNDER
SECTION 44-10-203.
(III) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER MUST REPORT TO THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(A) THE NUMBER OF TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMITS THE LICENSEE WAS ISSUED IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(B) THE LOCAL JURISDICTION AND LOCATIONS OF EACH
-8- 1117

TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT; AND
(C) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY IN RULES ADOPTED UNDER SECTION 44-10-203 (2)(mm).
(e) Not open and public consumption. FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 16 (3)(d) OF ARTICLE XVIII OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION,
CONSUMPTION OF MARIJUANA OCCURRING AT AN EVENT PREMISES
LOCATION CONDUCTED UNDER A VALID TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE "OPEN AND PUBLIC
CONSUMPTION" WHEN THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS ARE MET:
(I) THE EVENT PREMISES ARE RESTRICTED TO INDIVIDUALS
TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD OR OLDER;
(II) THE EVENT PREMISES WHERE CONSUMPTION OCCURS IS
OBSCURED FROM PUBLIC VIEW;
(III) ACCESS TO THE EVENT PREMISES IS LIMITED THROUGH
CONTROLLED ENTRY POINTS WITH SECURITY PERSONNEL AND
CREDENTIALED ENTRY; AND
(IV) THE EVENT COMPLIES WITH THE LAW OF COLORADO AND THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION. THE APPLICABLE LAW INCLUDES:
(A) APPLICABLE NOISE, ODOR, AND AIR-QUALITY LAWS;
(B) THE "COLORADO CLEAN INDOOR AIR ACT", PART 2 OF
ARTICLE 14 OF TITLE 25; AND
(C) APPLICABLE VENTILATION OR OPEN-AIR RULES ADOPTED BY
THE AIR QUALITY CONTROL COMMISSION CREATED IN SECTION 25-7-104
(1).
(f) Enforcement and compliance.
(I) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT ISSUES A TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
-9- 1117

REGULATORY OVERSIGHT OF LICENSEE ACTIVITIES EXERCISED PURSUANT
TO AN APPROVED TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT.
THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY TAKE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION
AS AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 44-10-901 OR A LOCAL ORDINANCE AGAINST
A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT OR THE LICENSE OF
THE PERMIT HOLDER FOR A VIOLATION THAT CONCERNS THE PERMIT OR
THAT TAKES PLACE AT THE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(II) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT ADOPT RULES
REQUIRING STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVAL OR ISSUANCE OF A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT. THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY TAKE ACTION AGAINST THE LICENSE AS
AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 44-10-901 FOR A VIOLATION THAT CONCERNS A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT OR THAT TAKES
PLACE AT THE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-610, add (6)
as follows:
44-10-610. Retail marijuana hospitality and sales business
license - repeal.
(6) Temporary marijuana hospitality event permit.
(a) (I) A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT
AUTHORIZES A MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS TO HOST
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS WHERE CONSUMPTION OF
REGULATED MARIJUANA IS AUTHORIZED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION (6).
(II) TO BE ISSUED A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMIT BY THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY, AN APPLICANT MUST:
(A) HOLD AN APPROVED MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES
-10- 1117

BUSINESS LICENSE; AND
(B) BE ISSUED A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMIT BY A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY FOR EACH TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(b) Local licensing authority.
(I) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
AN ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, CREATE A
FRAMEWORK TO ISSUE AND REGULATE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS. IF THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY
ADOPTS A FRAMEWORK TO ISSUE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENT PERMITS, THE FRAMEWORK MUST:
(A) LIMIT A SINGLE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
TO SEVENTY-TWO HOURS;
(B) REQUIRE A PERMIT TO BE ISSUED FOR EACH TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT;
(C) REQUIRE AN APPLICATION BE SUBMITTED FOR EACH PERMIT;
(D) LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY
EVENTS TO FIFTEEN PER CALENDAR YEAR;
(E) MAKE A PERMIT NONTRANSFERRABLE; AND
(F) PROVIDE FOR AN APPEAL FOR DENYING THE ISSUANCE OF A
PERMIT TO AN APPLICANT.
(II) WHEN CREATING THE FRAMEWORK AUTHORIZED IN
SUBSECTION (6)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY
MAY:
(A) IMPOSE REASONABLE CONDITIONS CONCERNING SAFETY,
TRAFFIC, AND NEIGHBORHOOD AFFECTS REQUIRED TO ISSUE A TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT; AND
-11- 1117

(B) SET THE PERMIT FEE TO COVER THE COST OF ISSUING AND
ADMINISTRATING THE FRAMEWORK.
(III) A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT ISSUE A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT UNLESS THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION HAS ADOPTED A RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE AUTHORIZING
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION.
(c) Application and issuance.
(I) (A) TO BE ISSUED AND TO HOLD A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT, AN APPLICANT MUST FILE AN APPLICATION
WITH THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS BEFORE
THE APPLICANT'S PROPOSED TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(B) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY REVIEWS TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATIONS AND ISSUES
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS. UPON AN
APPLICATION BY A MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS
LICENSEE, THE LOCAL LICENSING SHALL INVESTIGATE EACH TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATION AND SHALL EITHER
APPROVE OR DENY THE APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE
10 AND ANY APPLICABLE LOCAL ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION.
(C) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY DOES NOT REVIEW
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT APPLICATIONS OR
ISSUE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMITS.
(II) WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER ISSUING A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT, THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL
REPORT, IN A MANNER REQUIRED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY,
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(A) THE ISSUANCE OF THE PERMIT;
-12- 1117

(B) THE NAME OF THE MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY BUSINESS AND
SALES LICENSEE ISSUED THE PERMIT;
(C) THE ADDRESS OF THE PERMITTED EVENT LOCATION; AND
(D) THE PERMITTED DATES AND TIMES FOR THE EVENT.
(d) Requirements and limitations.
(I) A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER
SHALL NOT:
(A) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT IN
A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT HAS NOT ADOPTED A RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE AUTHORIZING TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENTS
WITHIN THE JURISDICTION;
(B) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
WITHOUT A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (6) BY A LOCAL
LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(C) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT ON
PREMISES LICENSE TO SELL OR SERVE ALCOHOL UNDER ARTICLE 3 OR 4 OF
THIS TITLE 44;
(D) CONDUCT A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT ON
PREMISES LICENSE TO SELL OR SERVE REGULATED MARIJUANA UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 10;
(E) SELL, TRANSFER, OR DISTRIBUTE REGULATED MARIJUANA AT
A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT;
(F) OPERATE A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT FOR
LONGER THAN SEVENTY-TWO CONSECUTIVE HOURS;
(G) HOST MORE THAN FIFTEEN TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENTS DURING A CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(H) VIOLATE A LAW ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL LICENSING
-13- 1117

AUTHORITY, THIS ARTICLE 10, OR A RULE ADOPTED UNDER THIS ARTICLE
10 BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(II) DURING A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT, THE
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER SHALL
PROVIDE, AT EACH ENTRANCE TO THE EVENT PREMISES, A PAMPHLET OF
EDUCATION MATERIALS THAT COMPLIES WITH THE RULES ADOPTED UNDER
SECTION 44-10-203.
(III) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT HOLDER MUST REPORT TO THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(A) THE NUMBER OF TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT
PERMITS THE LICENSEE WAS ISSUED IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(B) THE LOCAL JURISDICTION AND LOCATIONS OF EACH
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT; AND
(C) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY IN RULES ADOPTED UNDER SECTION 44-10-203 (2)(mm).
(e) Not open and public consumption. FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 16 (3)(d) OF ARTICLE XVIII OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION,
CONSUMPTION OF MARIJUANA OCCURRING AT AN EVENT PREMISES
LOCATION CONDUCTED UNDER A VALID TEMPORARY MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE "OPEN AND PUBLIC
CONSUMPTION" WHEN THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS ARE MET:
(I) THE EVENT PREMISES ARE RESTRICTED TO INDIVIDUALS
TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD OR OLDER;
(II) THE EVENT PREMISES WHERE CONSUMPTION OCCURS IS
OBSCURED FROM PUBLIC VIEW;
(III) ACCESS TO THE EVENT PREMISES IS LIMITED THROUGH
-14- 1117

CONTROLLED ENTRY POINTS WITH SECURITY PERSONNEL OR
CREDENTIALED ENTRY; AND
(IV) THE EVENT COMPLIES WITH THE LAW OF COLORADO AND THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION. THE APPLICABLE LAW INCLUDES:
(A) APPLICABLE NOISE, ODOR, AND AIR-QUALITY LAWS;
(B) THE "COLORADO CLEAN INDOOR AIR ACT", PART 2 OF
ARTICLE 14 OF TITLE 25; AND
(C) APPLICABLE VENTILATION OR OPEN-AIR RULES ADOPTED BY
THE AIR QUALITY CONTROL COMMISSION CREATED IN SECTION 25-7-104
(1).
(f) Enforcement and compliance.
(I) THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT ISSUES A TEMPORARY
MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
REGULATORY OVERSIGHT OF LICENSEE ACTIVITIES EXERCISED PURSUANT
TO AN APPROVED TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT.
THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY TAKE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION
AS AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 44-10-901 OR A LOCAL ORDINANCE AGAINST
A TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT OR THE LICENSE OF
THE PERMIT HOLDER FOR A VIOLATION THAT CONCERNS THE PERMIT OR
THAT TAKES PLACE AT THE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
(II) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT ADOPT RULES
REQUIRING STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVAL OR ISSUANCE OF A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT. THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY TAKE ACTION AGAINST THE LICENSE AS
AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 44-10-901 FOR A VIOLATION THAT CONCERNS A
TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT PERMIT OR THAT TAKES
PLACE AT THE TEMPORARY MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY EVENT.
-15- 1117

SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect January 4, 2027; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this
act or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period
after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect January 4, 2027, or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
-16- 1117